Florida, session 2026, SB1202.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 36 37 Section 1.âSubsections (2) and (3) of section 92.70, 38 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 39 92.70âEyewitness identification.â 40 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 41 (a)ââEyewitnessâ means a person whose identification by 42 sight of another person may be relevant in a criminal 43 proceeding. 44 (b)ââFacial recognition technologyâ means an automated or 45 semiautomated tool that captures biometric information, analyzes 46 facial features, and is used for identification, verification, 47 or tracking the location of an individual. The term does not 48 include the use of search terms to sort images in a database. 49 (c)ââFillerâ means a person or a photograph of a person who 50 is not suspected of a crime under investigation and is included 51 in an identification procedure. 52 (d)ââIdentification procedureâ means a live lineup, photo 53 lineup, or show-up. 54 (e)(b)ââIndependent administratorâ means a person who is 55 not participating in the investigation of a criminal offense and 56 is unaware of which person in the lineup is the suspect. 57 (f)(c)ââLineupâ means a photo lineup or live lineup. 58 (g)(d)ââLineup administratorâ means the person who conducts 59 a lineup. 60 (h)(e)ââLive lineupâ means a procedure in which a group of 61 people is displayed to an eyewitness for the purpose of 62 determining if the eyewitness can identify the perpetrator of a 63 crime. 64 (i)(f)ââPhoto lineupâ means a procedure in which an array 65 of photographs is displayed to an eyewitness for the purpose of 66 determining if the eyewitness can identify the perpetrator of a 67 crime. 68 (j)ââShow-upâ means a procedure in which an eyewitness is 69 presented with a single suspect for the purpose of determining 70 whether the eyewitness identifies the person as the perpetrator 71 of a crime. 72 (3)âEYEWITNESS IDENTIFICATION PROCEDURES.âA lineup 73 conducted in this state by a state, county, municipal, or other 74 law enforcement agency must meet all of the following 75 requirements: 76 (a)âThe lineup must be conducted by an independent 77 administrator. However, in lieu of using an independent 78 administrator, a law enforcement agency may conduct a photo 79 lineup eyewitness identification procedure using an alternative 80 method specified in subparagraph 1., subparagraph 2., or 81 subparagraph 3. Any alternative method must be carefully 82 structured to achieve neutral administration and to prevent the 83 lineup administrator from knowing which photograph is being 84 presented to the eyewitness during the identification procedure. 85 Alternative methods may include any of the following: 86 1.âAn automated computer program that can automatically 87 administer the photo lineup directly to an eyewitness and 88 prevent the lineup administrator from seeing which photograph 89 the eyewitness is viewing until after the procedure is 90 completed. 91 2.âA procedure in which photographs are placed in folders, 92 randomly numbered, and shuffled and then presented to an 93 eyewitness such that the lineup administrator cannot see or 94 track which photograph is being presented to the eyewitness 95 until after the procedure is completed. 96 3.âAny other procedure that achieves neutral administration 97 and prevents the lineup administrator from knowing which 98 photograph is being presented to the eyewitness during the 99 identification procedure. 100 (b)âBefore an identification procedure, a law enforcement 101 officer shall record a description as complete as possible of 102 the perpetrator of a crime, provided by the eyewitness in the 103 eyewitnessâs own words, and shall include the description in the 104 offense report. This statement must also include, from the 105 eyewitnessâs point of view, information regarding the conditions 106 under which the eyewitness observed the perpetrator, including 107 location, time, distance, obstructions, lighting, weather 108 conditions, and other impairments, including, but not limited 109 to, alcohol, drugs, stress, and visual or auditory disabilities. 110 (c)âTo include a suspect in a lineup, a law enforcement 111 officer or agency must have an evidence-based reason to believe 112 that such suspect committed the crime under investigation. If 113 facial recognition technology is used to identify a suspect, a 114 law enforcement officer or agency may not conduct a lineup 115 unless there is a basis, independent of the use of facial 116 recognition technology, to support a belief that the suspect 117 committed the crime under investigation. 118 (d)âA lineup must be composed of the suspect and at least 119 five fillers who generally resemble the eyewitnessâs description 120 of the perpetrator, and the law enforcement officer or agency 121 shall ensure that the suspect does not stand out from the 122 fillers in appearance. The photograph of the suspect that is 123 included in a photo lineup must be contemporary and must 124 resemble the suspectâs appearance at the time of the crime under 125 investigation. The photographs and the background context in 126 which such photographs are placed must be free from any 127 characteristics that make any photograph stand out. 128 1.âIf there is more than one suspect, only one suspect may 129 be included in each identification procedure. If the eyewitness 130 has previously viewed a lineup in connection with the 131 identification of another person suspected of involvement in the 132 crime under investigation, the fillers in the lineup in which 133 the current suspect is included must be different from the 134 fillers used in any prior lineups. 135 2.âIf there are multiple eyewitnesses to a crime under 136 investigation, each eyewitness must view the identification 137 procedure separately and the suspect must be placed in a 138 different position in the lineup for each eyewitness. 139 3.âOnly one identification procedure involving the same 140 eyewitness and suspect may be conducted. 141 (e)âA law enforcement officer or agency shall make efforts 142 to perform a lineup instead of a show-up or a first-time-in 143 court identification. 144 1.âShow-ups may only be performed using a live suspect and 145 only in exigent circumstances that require the immediate display 146 of a suspect to an eyewitness close to the time and place of the 147 crime scene. In the event of a show-up, the eyewitness must be 148 transported to a neutral, non-law enforcement location where the 149 suspect is detained for the purpose of the show-up. Unless 150 impractical, a show-up may not be conducted when the suspect is 151 in a patrol car, noticeably handcuffed, or physically restrained 152 by officers. 153 2.âAn eyewitness may not identify the defendant for the 154 first time in court unless the prosecutor provides a good reason 155 for the failure to conduct an out-of-court identification 156 procedure. A relationship of close familiarity which minimizes 157 the risk of misidentification, such as that of an immediate 158 family member, a close friend, or a daily coworker, constitutes 159 a good reason. 160 (f)(b)âBefore an identification procedure a lineup, the 161 eyewitness must be instructed that: 162 1.âThe perpetrator might or might not be in the lineup or, 163 in the case of a show-up, might or might not be the person that 164 is presented to the eyewitness; 165 2.âThe lineup administrator does not know the suspectâs 166 identity, except that this instruction need not be given when a 167 specified and approved alternative method of neutral 168 administration is used; 169 3.âThe eyewitness must should not feel compelled to make an 170 identification; 171 4.âIt is as important to exclude innocent persons as it is 172 to identify the perpetrator; and 173 5.âThe investigation will continue with or without an 174 identification; 175 6.âAfter an identification, the administrator will ask the 176 eyewitness to state, in his or her own words, how certain he or 177 she is of the identification; and 178 7.âThe eyewitness may not discuss the identification 179 procedure or results with any other eyewitnesses involved in the 180 investigation and may not speak with the media about such 181 identification procedure. 182 183 The eyewitness shall acknowledge, in writing, having received a 184 copy of the lineup instructions. If the eyewitness refuses to 185 sign a document acknowledging receipt of the instructions, the 186 lineup administrator must document the refusal of the eyewitness 187 to sign a document acknowledging receipt of the instructions, 188 and the lineup administrator must sign the acknowledgment 189 document himself or herself. 190 (g)âAfter an identification procedure, the lineup 191 administrator shall document any identification or 192 nonidentification. Such documentation must include a clear 193 statement from the eyewitness, at the time of the identification 194 and in the eyewitnessâs own words, as to the eyewitnessâs 195 confidence level that the person he or she identified is the 196 perpetrator of the crime under investigation. 197 (h)âAll identification procedures must be captured by audio 198 and video recording unless visual recording is unavailable, in 199 which case the recording of audio alone is permissible. 200 (i)âThe prosecuting attorney and the suspectâs attorney may 201 be present during a lineup to observe the manner in which the 202 lineup is conducted. Such persons must be out of the view of the 203 eyewitness and must be instructed to remain silent during the 204 procedure and to refrain from exercising any influence on the 205 procedure. 206 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.